Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.60.050

False certification.

(1) A person is guilty of false certification, if, being an officer authorized to take a proof or acknowledgment of an instrument which by law may be recorded, he or she knowingly certifies falsely that the execution of such instrument was acknowledged by any party thereto or that the execution thereof was proved.

(2) A person is guilty of false certification, if, being a notarial officer making a certification authorized by RCW 42.45.020(3), he or she knowingly certifies falsely that a tangible copy of an electronic record is an accurate copy of the electronic record.

(3) False certification is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2019 c 154 s 7; 2011 c 336 s 384; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 15; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.60.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 154: See note following RCW 42.45.280.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.